Idaho, session 2025, H0381.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3042A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3042A. EVIDENCE OF EXPENDITURES. For the purpose of documenting
an expenditure as a deduction or credit under this chapter, absent clear
and convincing evidence of fraud, a taxpayer's statement or invoice from
a credit card company or other financial institution reflecting the ex-
penditure shall conclusively establish that the expenditure was made by
the taxpayer, and the taxpayer's sworn statement that the expenditure was
made for an identified deductible purpose shall conclusively establish a
taxpayer's right to a deduction or credit. In any audit, assertion of defi-
ciency or other proceeding in which substantiation of a deductible expense
paid by credit card, debit card, or other electronic means is in question,
the state tax commission shall notify a taxpayer in writing of the provi-
sions of this section and retain proof that such notice has been provided as
required by this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.